GRAMMARS/POLISH/FST/src/guesser.xfst
# ============================================================================
# FILE:		/opt/Mltt/lingdata/pol/lex/src/guesser.xfst
# CONTENT:	(x)fst script for inflectional guesser
#
# LANGUAGE:	POLISH (ISO-8859-2)
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	29-Jul-1999
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define character sets
define	UPP	[ A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z
		| Ą|Ć|Ę|Ł|Ń|Ó|Ś|Ź|Ż ];
define	LOW	[ a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z
		| ą|ć|ę|ł|ń|ó|ś|ź|ż ];

define Cons	[ b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z
		| ć|ł|ń|ś|ź|ż ];

define Cons1	Cons - ć ;

define Vowel	[ a|e|i|o|u|ą|ę|ó|y ];

define DIGIT	[ %0|1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ] ;

define SPEC	[ %- | %/ | %. | %: | %@ | %* | %& ];


define PREF	[[UPP|LOW|DIGIT]+ %-]+ ;

define NUMSEP	[ %. | %, ] ;
define NUMOP	[ %- | %+ | %/ | %* | %: | %= | %< | %> ] ;
define PAREN	[ %( | %) | %[ | %] ] ;

define CARD	[ DIGIT [NUMSEP DIGIT+]* ] ;
define ORD	[ DIGIT+ %.]+ ;

define MATH	[ DIGIT | NUMSEP | NUMOP | PAREN ]+ & $DIGIT ;
define MATH1	[ MATH - [CARD|ORD] ];

# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> numerals ...
define ROMAN [	
 [ m^<4 
  ([c m|d|c d|(d) c^<4]) 
  ([x c|l|x l|(l) x^<4]) 
  ([i x|v|i v|(v) i^<4]) ]
| [ M^<4 
  ([C M|D|C D|(D) C^<4])
  ([X C|L|X L|(L) X^<4]) 
  ([I X|V|I V|(V) I^<4]) ]
] - [] ;

# acronyms
define ACRON	[ UPP  [ UPP | LOW ]+ ] & $[UPP ?* UPP ];

# propername initials
define INIT	[ UPP %.]+ ;

echo >>> define categories and features ...
regex	[ 
  ROMAN 	%+Num:0 %+Rom:0 %+Card:0 "+hmm_NUM":0 
| ROMAN %. 	%+Num:0 %+Rom:0 %+Ord:0  "+hmm_ORD":0 
| CARD		%+Num:0 %+Dig:0 %+Card:0 "+hmm_NUM":0  
| ORD		%+Num:0 %+Dig:0 %+Ord:0  "+hmm_ORD":0 
| MATH		%+Num:0 %+Dig:0 %+Expr:0 "+hmm_NUM":0 

| (PREF) ACRON	%+Prop:0 %+Abbr:0 %+InvNum:0 %+InvCase:0 "+hmm_NOUN":0 
| INIT		%+Prop:0 %+Abbr:0 %+InvNum:0 %+InvCase:0 "+hmm_NOUN":0 
];
define GUESS1



# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> adjectives
 
define AdjStem	 [ (PREF) LOW+ Cons ];

define AdjSuffix [
  [y|i]			[ %+Adj %+Masc	%+Sg %+NomVoc ]:0
| [y|i]			[ %+Adj %+M3	%+Sg %+NomAccVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:a	[ %+Adj %+Fem	%+Sg %+NomVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:e	[ %+Adj %+Neut	%+Sg %+NomAccVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{ego}	[ %+Adj %+MN	%+Sg %+Gen ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{ego}	[ %+Adj %+M12	%+Sg %+GenAcc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{ej}	[ %+Adj %+Fem	%+Sg %+GenDatLoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{emu}	[ %+Adj %+MN	%+Sg %+Dat ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:ą	[ %+Adj %+Fem 	%+Sg %+AccIns ]:0
| [y|i]		0:m	[ %+Adj %+MN	%+Sg %+InsLoc ]:0
| [y:i|i]		[ %+Adj %+M1	%+Pl %+NomVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:e	[ %+Adj %+M23FN %+Pl %+NomAccVoc ]:0
| [y|i]		0:{ch}	[ %+Adj %+M1	%+Pl %+GenAccLoc ]:0
| [y|i]		0:{ch}	[ %+Adj %+MFN   %+Pl %+GenLoc ]:0
| [y|i]		0:m	[ %+Adj %+MFN	%+Pl %+Dat ]:0
| [y|i]		0:{mi}	[ %+Adj %+MFN	%+Pl %+Ins ]:0
];


define ADJ	[ AdjStem AdjSuffix "+hmm_ADJ":0];

# NOTE: phonological rules could be added!


# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> common nouns


define NounStem	 [ (PREF) LOW+ Cons ];

define NounSuffix [
		[ %+Noun %+M3	%+Sg %+NomAcc ]:0
|		[ %+Noun %+M12	%+Sg %+Nom ]:0
|	0:[a|u]	[ %+Noun %+M3	%+Sg %+Gen ]:0
|	0:a	[ %+Noun %+M12	%+Sg %+GenAcc ]:0
|	0:{owi} [ %+Noun %+Masc %+Sg %+Dat ]:0
|	0:{em}	[ %+Noun %+Masc %+Sg %+Ins ]:0
|	0:{ie}	[ %+Noun %+Masc %+Sg %+LocVoc ]:0
|	0:{u}	[ %+Noun %+Masc %+Sg %+LocVoc ]:0
|	0:{y}	[ %+Noun %+M3   %+Pl %+NomAccVoc ]:0	0:%^1
|	0:{y}	[ %+Noun %+M12  %+Pl %+NomVoc ]:0	0:%^1
|	0:{ów}	[ %+Noun %+M3   %+Pl %+Gen ]:0
|	0:{ów}	[ %+Noun %+M12  %+Pl %+GenAcc ]:0
|	0:{om}	[ %+Noun %+Masc %+Pl %+Dat ]:0
|	0:{ami}	[ %+Noun %+Masc %+Pl %+Ins ]:0
|	0:{ach}	[ %+Noun %+Masc %+Pl %+Loc ]:0

| 	o	[ %+Noun %+Neut	%+Sg %+NomAccVoc ]:0
| 	o:{a}	[ %+Noun %+Neut	%+Sg %+Gen ]:0
|	o:{u}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Sg %+Dat ]:0
|	o:{em}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Sg %+Ins ]:0
|	o:{ie}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Sg %+Loc ]:0
|	o:{a}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Pl %+NomAccVoc ]:0
|	o:0	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Pl %+Gen ]:0
|	o:{om}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Pl %+Dat ]:0
|	o:{ami}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Pl %+Ins ]:0
|	o:{ach}	[ %+Noun %+Neut %+Pl %+Loc ]:0

| 	a	[ %+Noun %+Fem	%+Sg %+Nom ]:0
| 	a:{y}	[ %+Noun %+Fem	%+Sg %+Gen ]:0 0:%^2
|	a:{ie}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Sg %+DatLoc ]:0
|	a:{ę}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Sg %+Acc ]:0
|	a:{ą}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Sg %+Ins ]:0
|	a:{o}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Sg %+Voc ]:0
|	a:{y}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Pl %+NomAccVoc ]:0 0:%^1
|	a:0	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Pl %+Gen ]:0
|	a:{om}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Pl %+Dat ]:0
|	a:{ami}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Pl %+Ins ]:0
|	a:{ach}	[ %+Noun %+Fem  %+Pl %+Loc ]:0

];

define NOUN1	[NounStem 0:%+ NounSuffix "+hmm_NOUN":0 ];

define NOUN [ NOUN1
.o.
	[..] -> i || [g|k] %+ _ e m .#.
.o.
	r %+ i -> r z  ,
	d %+ i -> d z i ,
	ł %+ i -> l i ,
	t %+ i -> c i 
.o.	
	y -> i || [g|k] %+ _ [%^1 | %^2], j %+ _ %^2 
.o.
	y -> e || [ c | z | l | ż ] %+_ [ %^1 ]
.o.
	[ %^1 | %^2 | %+ ] -> 0 
];

# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> adjectival proper names
 
define PropStem	 [ (PREF) UPP LOW+ Cons ];

define PropSuffix [
  [y|i]			[ %+Prop %+Masc	%+Sg %+NomVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:a	[ %+Prop %+Fem	%+Sg %+NomVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{ego}	[ %+Prop %+Masc	%+Sg %+GenAcc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{ej}	[ %+Prop %+Fem	%+Sg %+GenDatLoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:{emu}	[ %+Prop %+Masc	%+Sg %+Dat ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:ą	[ %+Prop %+Fem 	%+Sg %+AccIns ]:0
| [y|i]		0:m	[ %+Prop %+Masc	%+Sg %+InsLoc ]:0
| [y:i|i]		[ %+Prop %+Masc	%+Pl %+NomVoc ]:0
| [y:0|i]	0:e	[ %+Prop %+Fem 	%+Pl %+NomAccVoc ]:0
| [y|i]		0:{ch}	[ %+Prop %+Masc	%+Pl %+GenAccLoc ]:0
| [y|i]		0:{ch}	[ %+Prop %+Fem	%+Pl %+GenLoc ]:0
| [y|i]		0:m	[ %+Prop 	%+Pl %+Dat ]:0
| [y|i]		0:{mi}	[ %+Prop 	%+Pl %+Ins ]:0
];


define PROP	[ PropStem PropSuffix "+hmm_NOUN":0 ];

# NOTE: phonological rules could be added!



# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> verbs

define VerbStem 	[ LOW+ Cons ];

define INF	[ {wać}:{j} | {ąć}:0 ];
define VerbSuffix [
  INF.1			[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Infinit "+hmm_VINF" ]:0
| INF	0:{ę}		[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Ind %+Pres %+1P %+Sg "+hmm_VFIN" ]:0
| INF	0:{esz}		[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Ind %+Pres %+2P %+Sg "+hmm_VFIN" ]:0
| INF	0:{e}		[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Ind %+Pres %+3P %+Sg "+hmm_VFIN" ]:0
| INF	0:{emy}		[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Ind %+Pres %+1P %+Pl "+hmm_VFIN" ]:0
| INF	0:{ecie}	[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Ind %+Pres %+2P %+Pl "+hmm_VFIN" ]:0
| INF	0:{ą}		[ %+Verb %+Imperf %+Ind %+Pres %+3P %+Pl "+hmm_VFIN" ]:0

];

define VERB [ VerbStem VerbSuffix ];

# NOTE: phonological rules could be added!


# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> union
regex GUESS1 | ADJ | NOUN | PROP | VERB ;

define G1

echo >>> rudimentary proper names
define G2 [
	UPP [UPP|LOW|DIGIT|SPEC]+ 		%+Prop:0 %+InvNum:0 %+InvCase:0 "+hmm_NOUN":0
	];


echo >>> priority union
regex G1 .p. G2 ;
